Vermont statutes. Title 24 Municipal and County Government
Subchapter 2. Regional Transit Districts

§ 5121.
Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Municipality” means a town, city, or incorporated village.

“Legislative body” means the selectboard in the case of a town, the council or mayor and board of aldermen in the case of a city, and the trustees in the case of an incorporated village.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 195

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 5122.
Creation of regional transit districts.

A regional transit district may be created at any time by the act of the voters of each of two or more municipalities upon the written approval of the Agency of Transportation. Approval shall be based upon the results of studies carried out by the Agency of Transportation and by representatives of the municipalities to determine whether the municipalities involved constitute a reasonable transit district. Evidence shall be shown that funding will be adequate to provide a continuing transit program.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 195

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1995, No. 60

, § 27, eff. April 25, 1995.

§ 5123.
Regional transit district membership.

A regional transit district shall contain at least one representative appointed from each member municipality.
All representatives may be compensated and reimbursed by their respective municipalities for necessary and reasonable expenses.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 195

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 5124.
Annual budget and assessments.

Representatives to a regional transit district representing each participating municipality shall be appointed and any vacancy filled by the legislative body of such municipality.

A regional transit district shall elect a chair and a secretary, and, at its organization meeting, shall by a two-thirds vote of those representatives present and voting at the meeting, adopt such rules and create and fill such offices as it deems necessary or appropriate for the performance of its functions, including, without limitation, the number and qualification of members, terms of office, provisions for municipal representation and voting, and provisions for termination of membership.

A regional transit district may also have other members, who may be elected or appointed in the manner the regional transit district prescribes by rule.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 195

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 5125.
Purposes and powers.

The district may purchase, own, operate, or provide for the operation of land transportation facilities, and may contract for transit services, conduct studies, and contract with other governmental agencies, private companies, and individuals.

The district may exercise all powers necessary, appurtenant, convenient, or incidental to the carrying out of its functions, including the following:

to sue and be sued;

to acquire, purchase, hold, lease as a lessee, and use any franchise, property, real, personal, or mixed, tangible or intangible, or any interest therein, necessary or desirable for carrying out the purposes of the district, and to sell, lease as lessor, transfer, or dispose of any property or interest acquired by it;

to fix, alter, charge, and establish rates, fares, and other charges for the services and facilities within its area of operation, which rates, fees, and charges shall be equitable and just;

to acquire and operate, or provide for the operation of local transportation systems, public or private, within its area of operation or in a municipality not already a member of a district, with which it contracts to furnish transit service;

to make contracts of every name and nature and to execute all instruments necessary or convenient for the carrying on of its business;

to accept gifts or grants or loans of money or other property, and to enter into contracts, leases, or other transactions with any federal agency, the State, any agency of the State, or with any other public body of the State, including municipalities and school districts;

to adopt necessary rules;

to do all things necessary or convenient for the conduct of its business and the general welfare of the district in order to carry out the powers granted to it by this subchapter or any other law.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 195

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2015, No. 23

, § 126.

§ 5126.
[Reserved for future use.]

§ 5127.
Exemption; regulation; taxes.

The public transportation systems and facilities operated by a regional transit district are exempt from any of the regulatory provisions of Title 30 except that the transportation board may impose any regulatory provisions of Title 30 that it may determine from time to time to be necessary.

A regional transit district and its systems and facilities shall be exempt from the sales, purchase, and use taxes and from motor vehicle registration fees except those registration fees applicable to municipalities.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 195

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 5128.
Annual budget and assessments.

Each year the board of commissioners shall prepare a proposed budget for the district for the next fiscal year, which shall include an estimate of the revenue of the district from fares and other sources, except municipal contributions, and the expenses for the next fiscal year, including debt service. The proposed budget shall be sent to the legislative branch of any member municipality by certified mail. The board of commissioners may call a meeting or meetings of the residents of its member municipalities for the purpose of presenting the proposed budget. Any meeting called shall be warned by a notice published in a newspaper of general circulation in the area of operation at least seven days prior to the meeting containing the date, time and place at which the meeting is to be held and a statement of the purpose of the meeting.

Annually, following the distribution provided in subsection (a), the board of commissioners shall review the proposed budget of the district in light of any discussion, and shall then adopt the budget with or without changes and determine the contributions to be requested from member municipalities.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 195

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1983, No. 120

(Adj. Sess.).

§ 5129.
Liability of district.

Members of the regional transit district board shall not be held personally liable for any actions taken in their capacity as members of the board.

No tort liability shall attach to individual municipal members of regional transit districts.

Tort liability of the regional transit district shall be limited to $1,000,000.00 for each accident.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 195

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.